Arkansas, session 2025, HB1419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-67-313 is amended to read as follows:
23-67-313. Competitive selection.
(a)(1) The Insurance Commissioner shall make a good faith effort to
comply with the intent of the provisions requiring competitive selection of
the administrator of the Arkansas Workers' Compensation Insurance Plan and
servicing carriers.
(2) The administrator and servicing carriers under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section shall be competitively selected no less often than
every three (3) years.
(3) Consideration for the selection of the administrator and
servicing carriers under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall include
*ANS129*
02/03/2025 4:11:54 PM ANS129

HB1419
cost, finances, operating and service capabilities, and the record of service
and other factors deemed necessary for the effective and proper operation of
the plan.
(b) The commissioner may suspend formal bidding for the administrator
provided that if:
(1) The commissioner has sought and compared other
administrative services available;
(2) The commissioner deems there to have been in the interim a
satisfactory improvement in administrator and servicing carrier performance;
(3) The commissioner judges continuation of the present
administrator subject to the modifications herein set forth and to hereafter
be under this section and promulgated by rule of the commissioner to be in
the best interests of Arkansas;
(4)(A) Coverage and service is adequately and properly provided
to Arkansas employers entitled to insurance, and coverage is provided in
other states for employees of Arkansas employers to the extent possible and
the proper coverage is in the best interests of the employers and plan
operations.
(B) Adequate coverage of employees while working on a
temporary or occasional basis in other states is essential to Arkansas
employers and employees; and
(5) The administrator has an office in Arkansas and the office
has the staff and authority necessary to properly serve Arkansas employers
and the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this act under this
subchapter.
(b) The commissioner shall review the plan operations to ensure
compliance with this act. The commissioner shall review and report to the
Legislative Council and the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce and
the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce by September 1 of each year,
with the first report to be submitted no later than September 1, 1997,
including, but not limited to, the following information:
(1) Competitive selection of the administrator and servicing
carriers;
(2) Plan operating performance and service in accordance with
the intent of this act, including performance reviews of the administrator,
servicing carriers, and plan rules;
02/03/2025 4:11:54 PM ANS129

HB1419
(3) Proper authority and independence of the Arkansas office to
properly perform and secure prompt, fair, and reasonable service as required
by this act; and
(4) Coverage provided by the plan in other states, including
evidence providing that carriers promptly provide coverage for employees of
Arkansas employers working in other states as provided in this act.
(c) The commissioner is encouraged to hold public hearings as needed
to assist in achieving the objectives of this act and to assist with the
review and report provided to the Legislative Council and the Senate
Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the House Committee on Insurance and
Commerce.

























02/03/2025 4:11:54 PM ANS129